Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.14 Quality Self-Directed Services

40-8.14-1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this section:

“Activities of daily living” (ADL) means the routine activities that people tend to do every day without needing assistance. There are six (6) basic ADLs: eating, bathing, dressing, toileting, transferring (walking), and continence.

“Covered home- and community-based services (HCBS)” means any core, preventive, or specialized long-term-care services and supports available in a person’s home or a community-based living arrangement that the state is authorized to provide under the Medicaid state plan, the Medicaid section 1115 waiver, or any similar program.

“Direct-support services” means the range of home- and community-based services (HCBS) covered services that are identified in the Medicaid state plan, Rhode Island’s section 1115 waiver, or any similar program that may provide similar services in the future, and the rules and regulations promulgated by the executive office of health and human services (EOHHS) or a designated agency authorize individual home-care providers to provide. The direct-support services must be provided in accordance with applicable federal and state law, rules, and regulations and include, but are not limited to, personal care assistance, homemaker, and companion services that the state is authorized to provide under the Medicaid state plan, the Medicaid section 1115 waiver, or any similar program in the future, including:

Participant assistance with activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living as defined in this chapter;

Assistance with monitoring health status and physical condition;

Assistance with preparation and eating of meals (not the cost of the meal itself);

Assistance with housekeeping activities (bed making, dusting, vacuuming, laundry, grocery shopping, cleaning);

Assistance with transferring, ambulation, and use of special mobility devices assisting the participant by directly providing or arranging transportation; and

Other similar, in-home, non-medical long-term services and supports provided to an elderly person or individual with a disability by an individual provider to meet the person’s daily living needs and ensure that the person may adequately function in the person’s home and have safe access to the community.

“Director” means the director of the Rhode Island department of administration.

“Fiscal intermediary” means a third-party organization under contract with the EOHHS responsible for performing payroll and other employment-related functions on behalf of the participant.

The fiscal intermediary shall:

Be authorized by the secretary or a designated agency to receive and distribute support funds on behalf of a participant in accordance with the participant’s service plan; and

Act as a fiscal intermediary on behalf of a participant in compliance with all rules, regulations, and terms and conditions established by the secretary.

The fiscal intermediary shall not make any decisions regarding hiring, supervising, or firing individual providers.

“Individual provider” means an individual selected by and working under the direction of a Medicaid LTSS beneficiary or the beneficiary’s duly authorized representative to provide direct-support services to the participant in accordance with the beneficiary’s service plan, but does not include an employee of a provider agency, subject to the agency’s direction and control commensurate with agency employee status or an individual providing services to a participant electing the personal choice option in any program.

“Instrumental activities of daily living” means the skills a person needs to live safely and successfully in a residential setting of choice without outside supports. These skills include, but are not limited to, using the telephone, traveling, shopping, preparing meals, doing housework, taking medications properly, and managing money.

“Medicaid LTSS beneficiary” means a person who has been determined by the state to obtain Medicaid-funded long-term services and supports.

“Participant” means a Medicaid LTSS beneficiary who receives direct-support services from an individual provider.

“Participant’s representative” means a participant’s legal guardian or an individual having the authority and responsibility to act on behalf of a participant with respect to the provision of direct-support services.

“Provider representative” means a provider organization that is certified as the exclusive negotiating representative of individual providers as provided in §

40-8.15-7

.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Rhode Island executive office of health and human services (EOHHS).

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 110, § 1.

40-8.14-2.
Scope of coverage.

Individual providers may provide all authorized HCBS-covered services in accordance with the participant’s service plan at home and other Medicaid certified settings, to the extent the applicable federal and state laws and rules and regulations allow.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 110, § 1.

40-8.14-3.
Use of employee workforce.

The requirement under §

40-8.14-2

shall not restrict the state’s ability to afford participants and participants’ representatives who choose not to employ an individual provider, or are unable to do so, the option of receiving direct-support services through a personal choice option or through the employees of provider agencies, rather than through an individual provider.

Nothing in this chapter shall restrict the state’s ability to afford Medicaid LTSS beneficiaries authorized to receive HCBS-covered services with the freedom of choice guaranteed under Title XIX to enter into service delivery agreements with any authorized Medicaid provider.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 110, § 1.

40-8.14-4.
Duties of the executive office for health and human services.

The secretary shall afford to all Medicaid LTSS beneficiaries who receive authorized HCBS-covered services in accordance with a service plan the option of employing an individual provider to provide direct-support services.

The secretary shall modify program operations as necessary to ensure implementation of the individual provider model and to ensure all relevant vendors assist and cooperate as needed, including managed care organizations and providers of fiscal support, fiscal intermediary, financial management, or similar services to provide support to participants and participants’ representatives with regard to employing individual providers, and otherwise fulfill the requirements of this section, including the provisions of subsection (f) of this section.

The secretary shall have the authority to:

Establish reimbursement rates for all individual providers, in accordance with chapter 8.15 of this title, provided that these rates may permit individual provider variations based on traditional and relevant factors otherwise permitted by law; provided, however, that reimbursement rates shall be required to be approved by the general assembly;

Ensure delivery of required orientation programs for individual providers;

Implement training and educational opportunities negotiated in accordance with chapter 8.15 of this title for individual providers, as well as for participants and participants’ representatives who receive services from individual providers, including opportunities for individual providers to obtain certification documenting additional training and experience in areas of specialization;

In collaboration with the provider representative, provide for the maintenance of a public registry of individuals who have consented to be included to:

Allow for routine, emergency, and respite referrals of qualified individual providers who have consented to be included in the registry to participants and participants’ representatives;

Enable participants and participants’ representatives to gain improved access to, and choice among, prospective individual providers, including by having access to information about individual providers’ training, educational background, work experience, national criminal background check results, and availability for hire;

Establish provider qualification standards for individual providers, including undergoing a national criminal background check and behavior that would disqualify someone as an individual provider;

Establish other appropriate terms and conditions for the workforce of individual providers without infringing on participants’ or their responsible parties’ rights and responsibilities to hire, direct, supervise, or terminate the employment of their individual providers;

Establish an advisory board for participants, their representatives, and advocates, to communicate directly with the secretary about the provision of quality direct-support services.

The board shall consist of thirteen (13) members:

One of whom shall be the secretary of the executive office of health and human services, or a designee, who shall serve as chair;

Six (6) of whom shall be consumers of the individual provider model, two (2) to be appointed by the governor, two (2) to be appointed by the president of the senate, and two (2) to be appointed by the speaker of the house;

Three (3) of whom shall be representatives from statewide independent living centers, one to be appointed by the governor, one to be appointed by the president of the senate, and one to be appointed by the speaker of the house;

Three of whom shall be from a 501(c)(3) statewide senior advocacy organization, one to be appointed by the governor, one to be appointed by the president of the senate, and one to be appointed by the speaker of the house.

The board members shall be appointed for three-year (3) terms.

The board shall advise the secretary, or a designee, regarding issues relating to the quality, access, and consumer autonomy offered through the individual provider model; and

Contract with a fiscal intermediary service for the operations of the individual provider model.

The secretary’s authority in this section shall be subject to the state’s obligations to meet and negotiate under §

40-8.15-3

and chapter 7 of title 28, as modified and made applicable to individual providers under §

40-8.15-3

, and to agreements with any exclusive representative of individual providers, as authorized by § 40-8.15-3. Except to the extent otherwise provided by law, the secretary shall not undertake activities in subsections (c)(3) and (c)(4) of this section, prior to October 1, 2019, unless included in a negotiated agreement and an appropriation has been provided by the legislature to the secretary.

The secretary shall cooperate in the implementation of chapter 8.15 of this title with all other relevant state departments and agencies. Any entity providing relevant services, including, but not limited to, providers of fiscal support, fiscal intermediary, financial management, or similar services to provide support to participants and participants’ representatives with regard to employing individual providers shall assist and cooperate with the secretary in the operations of this section, including with respect to the secretary’s obligations under subsections (b) and (f).

The secretary, or a designee, shall, no later than October 1, 2019, and then quarterly thereafter, in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by EOHHS, compile and maintain a list of the names and addresses of all individual providers who have been paid for providing direct-support services to participants within the previous six (6) months. The list shall not include the name of any participant, or indicate that an individual provider is a relative of a participant or has the same address as a participant. The secretary, or a designee agency, shall share the lists with others as needed for the state to meet its obligations under this chapter and chapter 8.15 of this title. This sharing shall not include access to private data on participants or participants’ representatives. Nothing in this section or chapter 8.15 of this title shall alter the access rights of other private parties to data on individual providers.

The secretary shall immediately commence all necessary steps to ensure that direct-support services are offered in conformity with this section; to gather all information that may be needed for promptly compiling lists required under this section, including information from current vendors; and to complete any required modifications to currently providing direct-support services by October 1, 2019.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 110, § 1.

40-8.14-5.
Authority of the department of administration.

In accordance with chapter 8.15 of this title, the director shall have the authority to:

Meet and negotiate with any provider representative chosen pursuant to §

40-8.15-2(a)

;

In coordination with the secretary, negotiate over any of the topics in §

40-8.14-4(c)

and any other appropriate matters governing the workforce of individual providers without infringing on participants’ or their responsible parties’ rights and responsibilities to hire, direct, supervise, or terminate the employment of their individual providers; and

Execute a collective bargaining agreement, subject to any approval required under §

40-8.15-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 110, § 1.

40-8.14-6.
Severability.

Should any part of this chapter be declared invalid or unenforceable, or the enforcement or compliance with it is suspended, restrained, or barred, either by the state or by the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter shall remain in full force and effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 110, § 1.